Utah statutes.
53A-3-413.   Use of public school buildings and grounds as civic centers.
(1)  As used in this section, "civic center" means a public school building or
ground that is established and maintained as a limited public forum to
district residents for supervised recreational activities and meetings.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), all public school buildings and
grounds shall be civic centers.
(3)  Use of school property for civic center purposes may not interfere with a
school function or purpose.
